src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
# North Saami numerals

* **LEXICON OKTA** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALOKTA** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON BARE-LOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTANUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON BEALOKTANUPPELOHKAI** only sg

* **LEXICON OKTAGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTAVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTAGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTACIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTAGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTAOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTALOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON OKTALOHKI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTE**

* **LEXICON GUOKTE-pure** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALGUOKTE**

* **LEXICON BEALGUOKTE-pure** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON GUOKTENUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON BEALGUOKTENUPPELOHKAI**, only sg

* **LEXICON GUOKTEGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTENJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTEVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTEGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTECIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTEGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTEOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTELOGI**

* **LEXICON NUBBENUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBEGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBENJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBEVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBEGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBECIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBEGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBEOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBELOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON NUBBELOGI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMA**  Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALGOLBMA**  Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON NOLLA**  Case forms of nolla/nulla, as GOLBMA, but only Sg, no Cmp

* **LEXICON GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMAGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMACIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMAGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMAOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMALOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMALOGI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTA** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALVIHTTA** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON VIHTTANUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTAGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTANJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTAVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTAGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTALOGI**

* **LEXICON CIEZA** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALCIEZA** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON CIEZANUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZANJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZAVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZAGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZACIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZALOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON CIEZALOGI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCI** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON NumSTEMVOWELforms** Case forms of the basic digits

* **LEXICON BEALGAVCCI** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg

* **LEXICON GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIGAVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIOVCCATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCILOGATLOHKAI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCILOGI**

* **LEXICON LOGI**

* **LEXICON BEALLOGI** only sg

* **LEXICON CUODICASE**

* **LEXICON OKTACUOHTI**

* **LEXICON GUOKTECUODI**

* **LEXICON NUBBECUOHTI**

* **LEXICON GOLBMACUODI**

* **LEXICON VIHTTACUODI**

* **LEXICON CIEZACUODI**

* **LEXICON GAVCCICUODI**

* **LEXICON DUHAHAT**

* **LEXICON DUHATCASE**

* **LEXICON OKTADUHAT**

* **LEXICON GUOKTEDUHAT**

* **LEXICON NUBBEDUHAT**

* **LEXICON GOLBMADUHAT**

* **LEXICON VIHTTADUHAT**

* **LEXICON CIEZADUHAT**

* **LEXICON GAVCCIDUHAT**

* **LEXICON CIEZAS_N**  Collective numerals

* **LEXICON VIDAS_N**  Collective numerals

* **LEXICON BEANNOT** one and a half

* **LEXICON NARE**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON DIGITCASES**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE0**

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR** ordinal inflection when preceded
by .:, and with reduced case forms. The Err/Orth tag is added in the calling lexicon.

* **LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL** collectives

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>
